Hawaii statutes.
JOINDER OF
OFFENSES AND OF DEFENDANTS

Rules of Court

Joinder of offenses and defendants, see HRPP rule 8.

§806-21 Joinder of defendants; accessories,
receivers. Any number of accessories at different times to any felony, and
any number of receivers at different times of the whole or any part or parts of
any property which at one time have been stolen, taken, extorted, obtained,
embezzled, or otherwise disposed of in such a manner as to amount to a felony,
may be charged with substantive felonies in the same indictment and may be
tried together, notwithstanding the principal felon is not included in the same
indictment, or is not in custody, or amenable to justice. [L 1876, c 40, §14;
RL 1925, §4038; RL 1935, §5497; RL 1945, §10798; RL 1955, §258-8; HRS §711-21;
ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Separate trial is matter in discretion of court. 3 H. 30
(1867).

Convictions against several defendants jointly charged and
tried for several offenses upheld. 4 H. 509 (1882).

Joinder of principal and accessories upheld. 7 H. 734 (1889).

One may be charged in different counts in same indictment as
principal and as accessory before the fact in an attempt to commit a crime;
where this is done and one is convicted as principal he is not entitled to his
discharge because of acquittal of his alleged principal. 11 H. 591 (1898).

Severance rests in discretion of court. 46 H. 183, 377 P.2d
728 (1962). Denial not subject to reversal unless there was clear abuse of
discretion. 47 H. 185, 389 P.2d 146 (1963).

An accused person has no right to be tried with another
accused with him. 53 H. 574, 499 P.2d 678 (1972).

See 3 H. 90 (1869).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next